Rhode Island, session 2025, SB424.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-45.1 of the General Laws entitled "Career and Technical
Education [See Title 16 Chapter 97 - The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-45.1-4. Career and technical education tuition formula.
(a) The department of elementary and secondary education, in consultation with a
workgroup as described in subsection (c) of this section, shall develop a formula for calculating
tuition to career and technical education programs to be paid by the sending district. Said formula
shall be developed and a copy provided to the chairs of the senate committee on education and the
house committee on education no later than December 31, 2026.
(b) The tuition of all career and technical programs shall be posted on the school district's
website if the district operates a program or school that receives tuition for a career and technical
program. The sending school district shall remit tuition to the district that operates the career and
technical program. The provisions of § 16-45-10 shall be applicable to this section.
(c) The department shall convene a workgroup, including, but not limited to,
representatives from career and technical schools, the Rhode Island School Superintendents'
Association, the Rhode Island Association of School Committees, the National Education
Association, the Rhode Island Federation of Teachers and Health Professionals, and the Rhode
Island Career and Technical board of trustees. The purpose of the workgroup shall be to assist the
department in creating a formula for calculating tuition to career and technical education programs.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000711
========
LC000711 - Page 2 of 3